apertium-pl-uk.pl.dix
    <pardef n="da/wać__vblex">
      <e>
         <p>
          <l>wać</l>
          <r>wać<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ję</l>
          <r>wać<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>je</l>
          <r>wać<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__czyta"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ają</l>
          <r>wać<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>waj</l>
          <r>wać<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__czytaj"/>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wa</l>
          <r>wać<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__czytałem"/>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wając</l>
          <r>wać<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__będący"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wając</l>
          <r>wać<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wa</l>
          <r>wać<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__zdanie"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wan</l>
          <r>wać<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__kochany"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wano</l>
          <r>wać<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="grz/ać__vblex">
      <e>
         <p>
          <l>ać</l>
          <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eję</l>
          <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eje</l>
          <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__czyta"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eją</l>
          <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ej</l>
          <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__czytaj"/>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__czytałem"/>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ając</l>
          <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__będący"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ając</l>
          <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__zdanie"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__kochany"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ano</l>
          <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sp/ojrzeć__vblex">
      <e>
         <p>
          <l>ojrzeć</l>
          <r>ojrzeć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ojrzę</l>
          <r>ojrzeć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ojrzy</l>
          <r>ojrzeć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__czyta"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ojrzą</l>
          <r>ojrzeć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ójrz</l>
          <r>ojrzeć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__czytaj"/>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ojrzyj</l>
          <r>ojrzeć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__czytaj"/>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ojrza</l>
          <r>ojrzeć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__czytałem"/>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ojrze</l>
          <r>ojrzeć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__zdanie"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ojrzano</l>
          <r>ojrzeć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ojrzawszy</l>
          <r>ojrzeć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="zacz/ąć__vblex">
      <e>
         <p>
          <l>ąć</l>
          <r>ąć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nę</l>
          <r>ąć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nie</l>
          <r>ąć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__czyta"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ną</l>
          <r>ąć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nij</l>
          <r>ąć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__czytaj"/>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ąć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__ciąłem"/>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ę</l>
          <r>ąć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__picie"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ę</l>
          <r>ąć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__wzięty"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ęto</l>
          <r>ąć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ąwszy</l>
          <r>ąć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="dziać"><i>dzi</i><par n="grz/ać__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dodawać"><i>doda</i><par n="da/wać__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dostawać"><i>dosta</i><par n="da/wać__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lać"><i>l</i><par n="grz/ać__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nadawać"><i>nada</i><par n="da/wać__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="piać"><i>pi</i><par n="grz/ać__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="podawać"><i>poda</i><par n="da/wać__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rozdawać"><i>rozda</i><par n="da/wać__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rozpoznawać"><i>rozpozna</i><par n="da/wać__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="siać"><i>si</i><par n="grz/ać__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sprzedawać"><i>sprzeda</i><par n="da/wać__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="udawać"><i>uda</i><par n="da/wać__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="wiać"><i>wi</i><par n="grz/ać__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="wydawać"><i>wyda</i><par n="da/wać__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rozpocząć"><i>rozpocz</i><par n="zacz/ąć__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dawać"><i>da</i><par n="da/wać__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="spojrzeć"><i>sp</i><par n="sp/ojrzeć__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="grzać"><i>grz</i><par n="grz/ać__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zacząć"><i>zacz</i><par n="zacz/ąć__vblex"/></e>
